Delaware, session 153, HB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 25, Title 6 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Subchapter XI. Cumulative Remedies and Enhanced Penalties Multilevel Distribution Companies Â§ 2598. Violation of order or injunction; penalty. Definitions. Repealed by 77 Del. Laws, c. 282, Â§â4, effective June 10, 2010. As used in this subchapter: (1) âClearly and conspicuouslyâ means as defined in Â§ 2731 of this title. (2) âConsiderationâ includes all of the following: a finderâs fee, bonus, refund, override, commission, cross-commission, dividend, and any financial remuneration. (3) âMultilevel distribution companyâ means: a. Any person who does all of the following: 1. Sells, distributes, or supplies for valuable consideration a good or service through an independent agent, contractor, or distributor at different levels. 2. Pays consideration as a result of the sale of such goods or services or the recruitment, action, or performance of an additional participant. b. The term does not include a licensed insurance agent, insurance agency, licensed real estate broker, licensed real estate agent, licensed real estate agency, licensed securities dealer, licensed limited securities dealer, licensed securities salesperson, or licensed limited securities salesperson. (4) âMultilevel marketing programâ means the marketing program or plan of a multilevel distribution company. Â§ 2599. Required conduct and standards for a multilevel distribution company; disclosure; repurchase; cancellation; and penalties for violations. (a) At the time the purchaser signs a business opportunity contract or prior to the receipt of any consideration by the seller, whichever occurs first, the seller or the sellerâs representative must provide the prospective purchaser a written document, updated quarterly, that clearly and conspicuously discloses the following: (1) A first page that contains only the following language: a. âDISCLOSURE REQUIRED BY DELAWARE LAW.â. b. âYOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON WITHIN THREE MONTHS OF SIGNING IT.â. (2) The name of the seller, the name under which the seller is doing or intends to do business, and the name of any parent or affiliated company that will engage in a business transaction with a purchaser or accept responsibility for a multilevel marketing program. (3) A complete description of the compensation plan, including any inventory purchase requirements. (4) A full and detailed description of the actual service the seller will undertake to perform for the purchaser. (5) When the seller makes any statement concerning earnings or range of earnings that may be made through the multilevel marketing program, the statement: âNo guarantee of earnings or range of earnings can be made.â (6) If training is promised by the seller, a complete description of the training and the length of the training. (7) If the seller promises services to be performed in connection with the placement of the equipment, product, or supplies at a location where they will be sold or used, the full nature of those services as well as the nature of the agreements to be made with the owner or manager of the location where the purchaserâs equipment, product, or supplies will be placed. (8) If the seller represents, when soliciting, offering for sale, or selling or leasing a multilevel marketing program, that there is a âbuy-backâ arrangement or that the initial payment is protected from loss or âsecured,â the entire and precise nature of the âbuy-backâ, âprotectionâ, or âsecurityâ arrangement. (9) How many other purchasers are selling in the State. (10) The percentage of buyers who earn more than the initial payment and all inventory purchase requirements. (11) The median and typical earnings of every person involved in the program. (b) A violation of this section is deemed a violation of subchapter II of Chapter 25 of this title. (c) A multilevel distribution company may not require a participant in its marketing program to buy a good or service or pay any other consideration to participate in the marketing program unless the multilevel distribution company agrees to repurchase the goods, in the same form of payment as originally purchased, that are in resalable condition. (d) A multilevel distribution company must state in writing in each contract of participation in its marketing program all of the following: (1) A participant may cancel the contract for any reason within 3 months after the date of entering into the contract or the receipt of goods or services first ordered by notice to the multilevel distribution company. Notice may be sent by electronic mail or first-class mail. (2) On cancellation, the multilevel distribution company will repurchase the goods in the same form of payment as originally purchased. (3) The repurchase price will be at least 90% of the original price paid by the participant. (e) Any person who suffers damage or injury as a result of a violation of this section has a cause of action to recover 3 times the amount of actual damages, court costs, and reasonable attorneyâs fees. Such treble damages shall be in addition to any other damages to which the victim is entitled pursuant to common law or other provisions of the Delaware Code.